Hawaii statutes.
[§321-502] Definitions. As used in
this part:

"Adult" means a person eighteen years
of age or older.

"Adult death review information"
means information regarding the adult person and person's family, including:

(1) Social, medical, and legal histories;

(2) Death and birth certificates;

(3) Law enforcement investigative data;

(4) Medical examiner or coroner investigative data;

(5) Parole and probation information and records;

(6) Information and records of social service
agencies;

(7) Educational records; and

(8) Health care institution information.

"Department" means the department of
health.

"Developmental disability" means a
severe, chronic disability of a person that:

(1) Is attributable to a mental or physical
impairment or combination of mental and physical impairments;

(2) Is manifested before the person attains age
twenty-two;

(3) Is likely to continue indefinitely;

(4) Results in substantial functional limitations in
three or more of the following areas of major life activity:

(i) Self-care;

(ii) Receptive and expressive language;

(iii) Learning;

(iv) Mobility;

(v) Self-direction;

(vi) Capacity for independent living; and

(vii) Economic self-sufficiency; and

(5) Reflects the person's need for a combination and
sequence of special, interdisciplinary, or generic care, treatment, or other
services that are of lifelong or extended duration and are individually planned
and coordinated.

"Director" means the director of
health or the director’s designated representative.

"Intellectual disability" means
significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning resulting in or
associated with concurrent moderate, severe, or profound impairments in
adaptive behavior and manifested during the developmental period.

"Person with developmental or intellectual
disabilities" means an adult with a developmental or intellectual
disability.

"Preventable death" means a death
that reasonable medical, social, legal, psychological, or educational
intervention may have prevented.

"Provider of medical care" means any
health care practitioner who provides, or a facility through which is provided,
any medical evaluation or treatment, including dental and mental health
evaluation or treatment. [L 2012, c 162, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next